Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Appellate Division.....................  $ 22,637,870
(2) Professional services.................  $ 309,304,337
(3) Contract and Business
Services Division....................... $ 6,982,059
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Public Defense Services
Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Professional services................. $ 3,200,000
(2) Contract and Business
Services Division....................... $ 536,398
SECTION 3. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to be allocated to the Public  Defense Services Commission
for acquisition of a new financial management system.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5532 (SB 5532-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate May 16, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5532 (SB 5532-A) Page 2